Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 53. Consumer Data Protection Act.

[Effective January 1, 2023]

§ 59.1-575.
(Effective until January 1, 2023) Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Affiliate” means a legal entity that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another legal entity or shares common branding with another legal entity. For the purposes of this definition, “control” or “controlled” means (i) ownership
of, or the power to vote, more than 50 percent of the outstanding shares of any class of voting security of a company; (ii) control in any manner over the election of a majority of the directors or of individuals exercising similar
functions; or (iii) the power to exercise controlling influence over the management of a company.

“Authenticate” means verifying through reasonable means that the consumer, entitled to exercise his consumer rights in § 59.1-577, is the same consumer exercising such consumer rights with respect to the personal data at issue.

“Biometric data” means data generated by automatic measurements of an individual’s biological characteristics, such as a fingerprint, voiceprint, eye retinas, irises, or other unique biological patterns or characteristics that is used to identify a specific
individual. “Biometric data” does not include a physical or digital photograph, a video or audio recording or data generated therefrom, or information collected, used, or stored for health care treatment, payment, or operations under
HIPAA.

“Business associate” means the same meaning as the term established by HIPAA.

“Child” means any natural person younger than 13 years of age.

“Consent” means a clear affirmative act signifying a consumer’s freely given, specific, informed, and unambiguous agreement to process personal data relating to the consumer. Consent may include a written statement, including a statement written by electronic
means, or any other unambiguous affirmative action.

“Consumer” means a natural person who is a resident of the Commonwealth acting only in an individual or household context. It does not include a natural person acting in a commercial or employment context.

“Controller” means the natural or legal person that, alone or jointly with others, determines the purpose and means of processing personal data.

“Covered entity” means the same as the term is established by HIPAA.

“Decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning a consumer” means a decision made by the controller that results in the provision or denial by the controller of financial and lending services, housing, insurance, education enrollment,
criminal justice, employment opportunities, health care services, or access to basic necessities, such as food and water.

“De-identified data” means data that cannot reasonably be linked to an identified or identifiable natural person, or a device linked to such person. A controller that possesses “de-identified data” shall comply with the requirements of subsection A of
§ 59.1-581.

“Fund” means the Consumer Privacy Fund established pursuant to § 59.1-585.

“Health record” means the same as that term is defined in §

32.1-127.1:03

.

“Health care provider” means the same as that term is defined in §

32.1-276.3

.

“HIPAA” means the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq.).

“Identified or identifiable natural person” means a person who can be readily identified, directly or indirectly.

“Institution of higher education” means a public institution and private institution of higher education, as those terms are defined in §

23.1-100

.

“Nonprofit organization” means any corporation organized under the Virginia Nonstock Corporation Act (§

13.1-801

et seq.) or any organization exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3), 501(c)(6), or 501 (c)(12) of the Internal Revenue Code, and any subsidiaries and affiliates of entities organized pursuant to Chapter 9.1 (§ 56-231.15
et seq.) of Title 56.

“Personal data” means any information that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable natural person. “Personal data” does not include de-identified data or publicly available information.

“Precise geolocation data” means information derived from technology, including but not limited to global positioning system level latitude and longitude coordinates or other mechanisms, that directly identifies the specific location of a natural person
with precision and accuracy within a radius of 1,750 feet. “Precise geolocation data” does not include the content of communications or any data generated by or connected to advanced utility metering infrastructure systems or equipment
for use by a utility.

“Process” or

“processing”
means any operation or set of operations performed, whether by manual or automated means, on personal data or on sets of personal data, such as the collection, use, storage, disclosure, analysis, deletion, or modification
of personal data.

“Processor” means a natural or legal entity that processes personal data on behalf of a controller.

“Profiling” means any form of automated processing performed on personal data to evaluate, analyze, or predict personal aspects related to an identified or identifiable natural person’s economic situation, health, personal preferences, interests, reliability,
behavior, location, or movements.

“Protected health information” means the same as the term is established by HIPAA.

“Pseudonymous data” means personal data that cannot be attributed to a specific natural person without the use of additional information, provided that such additional information is kept separately and is subject to appropriate technical and organizational
measures to ensure that the personal data is not attributed to an identified or identifiable natural person.

“Publicly available information” means information that is lawfully made available through federal, state, or local government records, or information that a business has a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general public through
widely distributed media, by the consumer, or by a person to whom the consumer has disclosed the information, unless the consumer has restricted the information to a specific audience.

“Sale of personal data” means the exchange of personal data for monetary consideration by the controller to a third party. “Sale of personal data” does not include:

The disclosure of personal data to a processor that processes the personal data on behalf of the controller;

The disclosure of personal data to a third party for purposes of providing a product or service requested by the consumer;

The disclosure or transfer of personal data to an affiliate of the controller;

The disclosure of information that the consumer (i) intentionally made available to the general public via a channel of mass media and (ii) did not restrict to a specific audience; or

The disclosure or transfer of personal data to a third party as an asset that is part of a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, or other transaction in which the third party assumes control of all or part of the controller’s assets.“Sensitive data” means
a category of personal data that includes:

“Third party” means a natural or legal person, public authority, agency, or body other than the consumer, controller, processor, or an affiliate of the processor or the controller.

1.
Personal data revealing racial or ethnic origin, religious beliefs, mental or physical health diagnosis, sexual orientation, or citizenship or immigration status;

2.
The processing of genetic or biometric data for the purpose of uniquely identifying a natural person;

3.
The personal data collected from a known child; or

4. Precise geolocation data. “State agency” means the same as that term is defined in §

2.2-307

.

“Targeted advertising”
means displaying advertisements to a consumer where the advertisement is selected based on personal data obtained from that consumer’s activities over time and across nonaffiliated websites or online applications to predict
such consumer’s preferences or interests. “Targeted advertising” does not include:

1.
Advertisements based on activities within a controller’s own websites or online applications;

2.
Advertisements based on the context of a consumer’s current search query, visit to a website, or online application;

3.
Advertisements directed to a consumer in response to the consumer’s request for information or feedback; or

4.
Processing personal data processed solely for measuring or reporting advertising performance, reach, or frequency.

History.
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35, 36.

Section set out twice.

This section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the version of the section effective January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered 59.1-575.

The numbers of this chapter and section
were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the numbers in the 2021 Sp. Sess. I acts having been Chapter 52 (§ 59.1-571 et seq.).

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35 and 36, cl. 2 provides: “The Chairman of the Joint Commission on Technology and Science shall create a work group composed of the Secretary of Commerce and Trade, the Secretary of Administration, the Attorney General, the
Chairman of the Senate Committee on Transportation, representatives of businesses who control or process personal data of at least 100,000 persons, and consumer rights advocates. The work group shall review the provisions of this act
and issues related to its implementation. The Chairman of the Joint Commission on Technology and Science shall submit the work group’s findings, best practices, and recommendations regarding the implementation of this act to the Chairmen
of the Senate Committee on General Laws and Technology and the House Committee on Communications, Technology and Innovation no later than November 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35 and 36, cl. 3 provides: “That any reference to federal law or statute in this act shall be deemed to include any accompanying rules or regulations or exemptions thereto. Further, this enactment is declaratory of existing
law.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35 and 36, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of the first and third enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2023.”

§ 59.1-575.
(Effective January 1, 2023) Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Affiliate” means a legal entity that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another legal entity or shares common branding with another legal entity. For the purposes of this definition, “control” or “controlled” means (i) ownership
of, or the power to vote, more than 50 percent of the outstanding shares of any class of voting security of a company; (ii) control in any manner over the election of a majority of the directors or of individuals exercising similar
functions; or (iii) the power to exercise controlling influence over the management of a company.

“Authenticate” means verifying through reasonable means that the consumer, entitled to exercise his consumer rights in § 59.1-577, is the same consumer exercising such consumer rights with respect to the personal data at issue.

“Biometric data” means data generated by automatic measurements of an individual’s biological characteristics, such as a fingerprint, voiceprint, eye retinas, irises, or other unique biological patterns or characteristics that is used to identify a specific
individual. “Biometric data” does not include a physical or digital photograph, a video or audio recording or data generated therefrom, or information collected, used, or stored for health care treatment, payment, or operations under
HIPAA.

“Business associate” means the same meaning as the term established by HIPAA.

“Child” means any natural person younger than 13 years of age.

“Consent” means a clear affirmative act signifying a consumer’s freely given, specific, informed, and unambiguous agreement to process personal data relating to the consumer. Consent may include a written statement, including a statement written by electronic
means, or any other unambiguous affirmative action.

“Consumer” means a natural person who is a resident of the Commonwealth acting only in an individual or household context. It does not include a natural person acting in a commercial or employment context.

“Controller” means the natural or legal person that, alone or jointly with others, determines the purpose and means of processing personal data.

“Covered entity” means the same as the term is established by HIPAA.

“Decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning a consumer” means a decision made by the controller that results in the provision or denial by the controller of financial and lending services, housing, insurance, education enrollment,
criminal justice, employment opportunities, health care services, or access to basic necessities, such as food and water.

“De-identified data” means data that cannot reasonably be linked to an identified or identifiable natural person, or a device linked to such person. A controller that possesses “de-identified data” shall comply with the requirements of subsection A of
§ 59.1-581.

“Health record” means the same as that term is defined in §

32.1-127.1:03

.

“Health care provider” means the same as that term is defined in §

32.1-276.3

.

“HIPAA” means the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq.).

“Identified or identifiable natural person” means a person who can be readily identified, directly or indirectly.

“Institution of higher education” means a public institution and private institution of higher education, as those terms are defined in §

23.1-100

.

“Nonprofit organization” means any corporation organized under the Virginia Nonstock Corporation Act (§

13.1-801

et seq.) or any organization exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3), 501(c)(6), or 501(c)(12) of the Internal Revenue Code, any political organization, any organization exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(4) of the Internal
Revenue Code that is identified in §

52-41

, and any subsidiary or affiliate of entities organized pursuant to Chapter 9.1 (§ 56-231.15 et seq.) of Title 56.

“Personal data” means any information that is linked or reasonably linkable to an identified or identifiable natural person. “Personal data” does not include de-identified data or publicly available information.

“Political organization” means a party, committee, association, fund, or other organization, whether or not incorporated, organized and operated primarily for the purpose of influencing or attempting to influence the selection, nomination, election, or
appointment of any individual to any federal, state, or local public office or office in a political organization or the election of a presidential/vice-presidential elector, whether or not such individual or elector is selected, nominated,
elected, or appointed.

“Precise geolocation data” means information derived from technology, including but not limited to global positioning system level latitude and longitude coordinates or other mechanisms, that directly identifies the specific location of a natural person
with precision and accuracy within a radius of 1,750 feet. “Precise geolocation data” does not include the content of communications or any data generated by or connected to advanced utility metering infrastructure systems or equipment
for use by a utility.

“Process” or “processing” means any operation or set of operations performed, whether by manual or automated means, on personal data or on sets of personal data, such as the collection, use, storage, disclosure, analysis, deletion, or modification of
personal data.

“Processor” means a natural or legal entity that processes personal data on behalf of a controller.

“Profiling” means any form of automated processing performed on personal data to evaluate, analyze, or predict personal aspects related to an identified or identifiable natural person’s economic situation, health, personal preferences, interests, reliability,
behavior, location, or movements.

“Protected health information” means the same as the term is established by HIPAA.

“Pseudonymous data” means personal data that cannot be attributed to a specific natural person without the use of additional information, provided that such additional information is kept separately and is subject to appropriate technical and organizational
measures to ensure that the personal data is not attributed to an identified or identifiable natural person.

“Publicly available information” means information that is lawfully made available through federal, state, or local government records, or information that a business has a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general public through
widely distributed media, by the consumer, or by a person to whom the consumer has disclosed the information, unless the consumer has restricted the information to a specific audience.

“Sale of personal data” means the exchange of personal data for monetary consideration by the controller to a third party. “Sale of personal data” does not include:

The disclosure of personal data to a processor that processes the personal data on behalf of the controller;

The disclosure of personal data to a third party for purposes of providing a product or service requested by the consumer;

The disclosure or transfer of personal data to an affiliate of the controller;

The disclosure of information that the consumer (i) intentionally made available to the general public via a channel of mass media and (ii) did not restrict to a specific audience; or

The disclosure or transfer of personal data to a third party as an asset that is part of a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, or other transaction in which the third party assumes control of all or part of the controller’s assets. “Sensitive data” means
a category of personal data that includes: “State agency” means the same as that term is defined in §

2.2-307

. “Targeted advertising” means displaying advertisements to a consumer where the advertisement is selected based on personal data obtained from that consumer’s activities over time and across nonaffiliated websites
or online applications to predict such consumer’s preferences or interests. “Targeted advertising” does not include: “Third party” means a natural or legal person, public authority, agency, or body other than the consumer, controller,
processor, or an affiliate of the processor or the controller.

1.
Personal data revealing racial or ethnic origin, religious beliefs, mental or physical health diagnosis, sexual orientation, or citizenship or immigration status;

2.
The processing of genetic or biometric data for the purpose of uniquely identifying a natural person;

3.
The personal data collected from a known child; or

4.
Precise geolocation data.

1.
Advertisements based on activities within a controller’s own websites or online applications;

2.
Advertisements based on the context of a consumer’s current search query, visit to a website, or online application;

3.
Advertisements directed to a consumer in response to the consumer’s request for information or feedback; or

4.
Processing personal data processed solely for measuring or reporting advertising performance, reach, or frequency.

History.
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35, 36; 2022, cc. 451, 452.

Section set out twice.

This section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the version of the section effective until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered 59.1-575.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 451 and 452 are identical, and deleted the definition of “Fund,” which read: “‘Fund’ means the Consumer Privacy Fund established pursuant to § 59.1-585”; in the definition of “Nonprofit organization,” inserted “any political
organization, any organization exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code that is identified in §

52-41

” and substituted “subsidiary or affiliate” for “subsidiaries and affiliates”; added the definition of “Political organization”; and made a stylistic change.

§ 59.1-576.
(Effective January 1, 2023) Scope; exemptions.

This chapter applies to persons that conduct business in the Commonwealth or produce products or services that are targeted to residents of the Commonwealth and that (i) during a calendar year, control or process personal data of at least 100,000 consumers
or (ii) control or process personal data of at least 25,000 consumers and derive over 50 percent of gross revenue from the sale of personal data.

This chapter shall not apply to any (i) body, authority, board, bureau, commission, district, or agency of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision of the Commonwealth; (ii) financial institution or data subject to Title V of the federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley
Act (15 U.S.C. § 6801 et seq.); (iii) covered entity or business associate governed by the privacy, security, and breach notification rules issued by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, 45 C.F.R. Parts 160 and 164
established pursuant to HIPAA, and the Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health Act (P.L. 111-5); (iv) nonprofit organization; or (v) institution of higher education.

The following information and data is exempt from this chapter:

Protected health information under HIPAA;

Health records for purposes of Title 32.1;

Patient identifying information for purposes of 42 U.S.C. § 290dd-2;

Identifiable private information for purposes of the federal policy for the protection of human subjects under 45 C.F.R. Part 46; identifiable private information that is otherwise information collected as part of human subjects research pursuant to the
good clinical practice guidelines issued by The International Council for Harmonisation of Technical Requirements for Pharmaceuticals for Human Use; the protection of human subjects under 21 C.F.R. Parts 6, 50, and 56,
or personal data used or shared in research conducted in accordance with the requirements set forth in this chapter, or other research conducted in accordance with applicable law;

Information and documents created for purposes of the federal Health Care Quality Improvement Act of 1986 (42 U.S.C. § 11101 et seq.);

Patient safety work product for purposes of the federal Patient Safety and Quality Improvement Act (42 U.S.C. § 299b-21 et seq.);

Information derived from any of the health care-related information listed in this subsection that is de-identified in accordance with the requirements for de-identification pursuant to HIPAA;

Information originating from, and intermingled to be indistinguishable with, or information treated in the same manner as information exempt under this subsection that is maintained by a covered entity or business associate as defined by HIPAA or a program
or a qualified service organization as defined by 42 U.S.C. § 290dd-2;

Information used only for public health activities and purposes as authorized by HIPAA;

The collection, maintenance, disclosure, sale, communication, or use of any personal information bearing on a consumer’s credit worthiness, credit standing, credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living by
a consumer reporting agency or furnisher that provides information for use in a consumer report, and by a user of a consumer report, but only to the extent that such activity is regulated by and authorized under the federal
Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. § 1681 et seq.);

Personal data collected, processed, sold, or disclosed in compliance with the federal Driver’s Privacy Protection Act of 1994 (18 U.S.C. § 2721 et seq.);

Personal data regulated by the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. § 1232g et seq.);

Personal data collected, processed, sold, or disclosed in compliance with the federal Farm Credit Act (12 U.S.C. § 2001 et seq.); and

Data processed or maintained (i) in the course of an individual applying to, employed by, or acting as an agent or independent contractor of a controller, processor, or third party, to the extent that the data is collected and used within the context
of that role; (ii) as the emergency contact information of an individual under this chapter used for emergency contact purposes; or (iii) that is necessary to retain to administer benefits for another individual relating
to the individual under clause (i) and used for the purposes of administering those benefits.

Controllers and processors that comply with the verifiable parental consent requirements of the Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (15 U.S.C. § 6501 et seq.) shall be deemed compliant with any obligation to obtain parental consent under this chapter.

History.
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35, 36.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2021 Sp. Sess. I act having been § 59.1-572.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35 and 36, cl. 3 provides: “That any reference to federal law or statute in this act shall be deemed to include any accompanying rules or regulations or exemptions thereto. Further, this enactment is declaratory of existing
law.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35 and 36, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of the first and third enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2023.”

§ 59.1-577.
(Effective until January 1, 2023) Personal data rights; consumers.

A consumer may invoke the consumer rights authorized pursuant to this subsection at any time by submitting a request to a controller specifying the consumer rights the consumer wishes to invoke. A known child’s parent or legal guardian may invoke such
consumer rights on behalf of the child regarding processing personal data belonging to the known child. A controller shall comply with an authenticated consumer request to exercise the right:

To confirm whether or not a controller is processing the consumer’s personal data and to access such personal data;

To correct inaccuracies in the consumer’s personal data, taking into account the nature of the personal data and the purposes of the processing of the consumer’s personal data;

To delete personal data provided by or obtained about the consumer;

To obtain a copy of the consumer’s personal data that the consumer previously provided to the controller in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily usable format that allows the consumer to transmit the data to another controller without
hindrance, where the processing is carried out by automated means; and

To opt out of the processing of the personal data for purposes of (i) targeted advertising, (ii) the sale of personal data, or (iii) profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning the consumer.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a controller shall comply with a request by a consumer to exercise the consumer rights authorized pursuant to subsection A as follows:

A controller shall respond to the consumer without undue delay, but in all cases within 45 days of receipt of the request submitted pursuant to the methods described in subsection A. The response period may be extended once by 45 additional days when
reasonably necessary, taking into account the complexity and number of the consumer’s requests, so long as the controller informs the consumer of any such extension within the initial 45-day response period, together with
the reason for the extension.

If a controller declines to take action regarding the consumer’s request, the controller shall inform the consumer without undue delay, but in all cases and at the latest within 45 days of receipt of the request, of the justification for declining to
take action and instructions for how to appeal the decision pursuant to subsection C.

Information provided in response to a consumer request shall be provided by a controller free of charge, up to twice annually per consumer. If requests from a consumer are manifestly unfounded, excessive, or repetitive, the controller may charge the consumer
a reasonable fee to cover the administrative costs of complying with the request or decline to act on the request. The controller bears the burden of demonstrating the manifestly unfounded, excessive, or repetitive nature
of the request.

If a controller is unable to authenticate the request using commercially reasonable efforts, the controller shall not be required to comply with a request to initiate an action under subsection A and may request that the consumer provide additional information
reasonably necessary to authenticate the consumer and the consumer’s request.

A controller shall establish a process for a consumer to appeal the controller’s refusal to take action on a request within a reasonable period of time after the consumer’s receipt of the decision pursuant to subdivision B 2. The appeal process shall
be conspicuously available and similar to the process for submitting requests to initiate action pursuant to subsection A. Within 60 days of receipt of an appeal, a controller shall inform the consumer in writing of any action
taken or not taken in response to the appeal, including a written explanation of the reasons for the decisions. If the appeal is denied, the controller shall also provide the consumer with an online mechanism, if available, or
other method through which the consumer may contact the Attorney General to submit a complaint.

History.
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35, 36.

Section set out twice.

This section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the version of the section effective January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered 59.1-577.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2021 Sp. Sess. I act having been § 59.1-573.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35 and 36, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of the first and third enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2023.”

§ 59.1-577.
(Effective January 1, 2023) Personal data rights; consumers.

A consumer may invoke the consumer rights authorized pursuant to this subsection at any time by submitting a request to a controller specifying the consumer rights the consumer wishes to invoke. A known child’s parent or legal guardian may invoke such
consumer rights on behalf of the child regarding processing personal data belonging to the known child. A controller shall comply with an authenticated consumer request to exercise the right:

To confirm whether or not a controller is processing the consumer’s personal data and to access such personal data;

To correct inaccuracies in the consumer’s personal data, taking into account the nature of the personal data and the purposes of the processing of the consumer’s personal data;

To delete personal data provided by or obtained about the consumer;

To obtain a copy of the consumer’s personal data that the consumer previously provided to the controller in a portable and, to the extent technically feasible, readily usable format that allows the consumer to transmit the data to another controller without
hindrance, where the processing is carried out by automated means; and

To opt out of the processing of the personal data for purposes of (i) targeted advertising, (ii) the sale of personal data, or (iii) profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning the consumer.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a controller shall comply with a request by a consumer to exercise the consumer rights authorized pursuant to subsection A as follows:

A controller shall respond to the consumer without undue delay, but in all cases within 45 days of receipt of the request submitted pursuant to the methods described in subsection A. The response period may be extended once by 45 additional days when
reasonably necessary, taking into account the complexity and number of the consumer’s requests, so long as the controller informs the consumer of any such extension within the initial 45-day response period, together with
the reason for the extension.

If a controller declines to take action regarding the consumer’s request, the controller shall inform the consumer without undue delay, but in all cases and at the latest within 45 days of receipt of the request, of the justification for declining to
take action and instructions for how to appeal the decision pursuant to subsection C.

Information provided in response to a consumer request shall be provided by a controller free of charge, up to twice annually per consumer. If requests from a consumer are manifestly unfounded, excessive, or repetitive, the controller may charge the consumer
a reasonable fee to cover the administrative costs of complying with the request or decline to act on the request. The controller bears the burden of demonstrating the manifestly unfounded, excessive, or repetitive nature
of the request.

If a controller is unable to authenticate the request using commercially reasonable efforts, the controller shall not be required to comply with a request to initiate an action under subsection A and may request that the consumer provide additional information
reasonably necessary to authenticate the consumer and the consumer’s request.

A controller that has obtained personal data about a consumer from a source other than the consumer shall be deemed in compliance with a consumer’s request to delete such data pursuant to subdivision A 3 by either (i) retaining a record of the deletion
request and the minimum data necessary for the purpose of ensuring the consumer’s personal data remains deleted from the business’s records and not using such retained data for any other purpose pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter or (ii) opting the consumer out of the processing of such personal data for any purpose except for those exempted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

A controller shall establish a process for a consumer to appeal the controller’s refusal to take action on a request within a reasonable period of time after the consumer’s receipt of the decision pursuant to subdivision B 2. The appeal process shall
be conspicuously available and similar to the process for submitting requests to initiate action pursuant to subsection A. Within 60 days of receipt of an appeal, a controller shall inform the consumer in writing of any action
taken or not taken in response to the appeal, including a written explanation of the reasons for the decisions. If the appeal is denied, the controller shall also provide the consumer with an online mechanism, if available, or
other method through which the consumer may contact the Attorney General to submit a complaint.

History.
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35, 36; 2022, c. 423.

Section set out twice.

This section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the version of the section effective until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered 59.1-577.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by c. 423 added subdivision B 5.

§ 59.1-578.
(Effective January 1, 2023) Data controller responsibilities; transparency.

A controller shall:

Limit the collection of personal data to what is adequate, relevant, and reasonably necessary in relation to the purposes for which such data is processed, as disclosed to the consumer;

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, not process personal data for purposes that are neither reasonably necessary to nor compatible with the disclosed purposes for which such personal data is processed, as disclosed to the consumer, unless the
controller obtains the consumer’s consent;

Establish, implement, and maintain reasonable administrative, technical, and physical data security practices to protect the confidentiality, integrity, and accessibility of personal data. Such data security practices shall be appropriate to the volume
and nature of the personal data at issue;

Not process personal data in violation of state and federal laws that prohibit unlawful discrimination against consumers. A controller shall not discriminate against a consumer for exercising any of the consumer rights contained in this chapter, including
denying goods or services, charging different prices or rates for goods or services, or providing a different level of quality of goods and services to the consumer. However, nothing in this subdivision shall be construed
to require a controller to provide a product or service that requires the personal data of a consumer that the controller does not collect or maintain or to prohibit a controller from offering a different price, rate, level,
quality, or selection of goods or services to a consumer, including offering goods or services for no fee, if the consumer has exercised his right to opt out pursuant to § 59.1-577 or the offer is related to a consumer’s
voluntary participation in a bona fide loyalty, rewards, premium features, discounts, or club card program; and

Not process sensitive data concerning a consumer without obtaining the consumer’s consent, or, in the case of the processing of sensitive data concerning a known child, without processing such data in accordance with the federal Children’s Online Privacy
Protection Act (15 U.S.C. § 6501 et seq.).

Any provision of a contract or agreement of any kind that purports to waive or limit in any way consumer rights pursuant to § 59.1-577 shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable.

Controllers shall provide consumers with a reasonably accessible, clear, and meaningful privacy notice that includes:

The categories of personal data processed by the controller;

The purpose for processing personal data;

How consumers may exercise their consumer rights pursuant § 59.1-577, including how a consumer may appeal a controller’s decision with regard to the consumer’s request;

The categories of personal data that the controller shares with third parties, if any; and

The categories of third parties, if any, with whom the controller shares personal data.

If a controller sells personal data to third parties or processes personal data for targeted advertising, the controller shall clearly and conspicuously disclose such processing, as well as the manner in which a consumer may exercise the right to opt
out of such processing.

A controller shall establish, and shall describe in a privacy notice, one or more secure and reliable means for consumers to submit a request to exercise their consumer rights under this chapter. Such means shall take into account the ways in which consumers
normally interact with the controller, the need for secure and reliable communication of such requests, and the ability of the controller to authenticate the identity of the consumer making the request. Controllers shall not require
a consumer to create a new account in order to exercise consumer rights pursuant to § 59.1-577 but may require a consumer to use an existing account.

History.
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35, 36.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2021 Sp. Sess. I act having been § 59.1-574.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35 and 36, cl. 3 provides: “That any reference to federal law or statute in this act shall be deemed to include any accompanying rules or regulations or exemptions thereto. Further, this enactment is declaratory of existing
law.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 35 and 36, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of the first and third enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2023.”